Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-UncountableConsEnd.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL +LOC +UN
LEXICON Root
NounUncountableConsEndStem;

LEXICON NounUncountableConsEnd

්+N+RT:් #;
්+N+RT+UN+ACC:් #;
්+N+RT+UN+NOM:් #;
්+N+RT+UN+ACC+CJ:ුත්  #;
්+N+RT+UN+NOM+CJ:ුත්  #;
්+N+RT+UN+ACC+FN:ුයි  #;
්+N+RT+UN+NOM+FN:ුයි  #;
්+N+RT+UN+INT:්වලින්  #;
්+N+RT+UN+ABL:්වලින්  #
්+N+RT+UN+INT+FN:්වලිනි #;
්+N+RT+UN+ABL+FN:්වලිනි #
්+N+RT+UN+INT+CJ:්වලිනුත් #;
්+N+RT+UN+ABL+CJ:්වලිනුත් #;
්+N+RT+UN+DAT:්වලට #;
්+N+RT+UN+DAT+CJ:්වලටත් #;
්+N+RT+UN+DAT+FN:්වලටයි #;
්+N+RT+PL+GEN:්වල #;
්+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ:්වලත් #;
්+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN:්වලයි #;
්+N+RT+PL+LOC:්වල #;
්+N+RT+PL+LOC+CJ:්වලත් #;
්+N+RT+PL+LOC+FN:්වලයි #;

LEXICON NounUncountableConsEndStem
අයන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අසමෝදගම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඇක්ටිනියම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඇස්ටටීන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඉල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
උඳුවප	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඔස්මියම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ක්‍රිකට	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කාබෝහියිඩ්‍රේඩ	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කිලෝමීටර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කොකේන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කොරල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කෝල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ගෙන්දගම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
චුයින්ගම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ටංස්ටන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ටින	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ටෙලිග්‍රෑම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ණයතුරුස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
දෙසැම්බර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
නවම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
නෙප්චූන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පාන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පැපොල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පුළුන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පොලොස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පෝස්ටර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
බබල්ගම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
බිස්කට	NounUncountableConsEnd;
බෝරෝන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මැංගුස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මිල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මුතුලැල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
රත්තරන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
රබර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
රූතේනියම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ලැන්තනම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
වප	NounUncountableConsEnd;
වල්පල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
වොලිබෝල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සර්කස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ස්ටාර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සිල්වර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සුප	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සෝඩියම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
හෝටල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
නලාවල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
හෙක්සෝස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ලෝපස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඊයම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
බයිකාබනේට	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සිරගෙවල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
උණගස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ග්‍රැෆික	NounUncountableConsEnd;
තාණ්ඩිකුලම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පුන්කළස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මෙගාබයිට	NounUncountableConsEnd;
වින්ඩෝස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
දොඩම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
නාගස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අංගයන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අචිත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අඩිල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අතිනත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අත්ලන්තික	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අදිකාරම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අධීක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අනුබෙදුම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අන්කර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අන්ධවීම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අබරන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අම්බාට	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අරවුල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අලීන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අවධානයම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අසන්නන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අසිරිමත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අස්ථානගතවීම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
අැඳීම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ආඳන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ආරක්ෂාවන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ආසත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඇටුවම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඇතිදඬුවම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඇතුළුත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඇඳෙන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඇලෙක්සැන්ඩර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඇසිටෝන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඉගනුම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඉටාගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඉදිරිපත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඉන්ද්‍රලාල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඉරුගල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඉලුක්හේන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඉලෙක්ට්‍රෝනික	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඉස්රායීල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඊබට	NounUncountableConsEnd;
උගැන්වුම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
උඩත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
උණුවෙන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
උදිත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
උපදවාගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
උරුවෙල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
උස්ගල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
එකතුකිරිම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
එක්ස්ත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
එන්තර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
එල්ලාගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
එළිච්චියක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඔට්ටුවෙන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඔළුවිල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඕසෝන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කඩපිලක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කණ්‍ඩායම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කතාකීම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කපාගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කම්පාවන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කරවාගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කර්ත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කලාපයම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කල්හාන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කළමනාකරුවන්ගේ	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කාඩියැක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කායෙන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කාලෝස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කැරගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කෑමබීම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කිරීමත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කීටෝන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කුඹුක්කන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කෙල්ටික	NounUncountableConsEnd;
කොලෝසියම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ක්ලෝස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ගංගානම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ගමනෙක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ගලත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ගාම්බීර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ගැසුම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ගීෂාන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ගෙපැළක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ගොවිබ්ම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
චමුදිත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ජඩ	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ජයපිරිත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ජීවනෝපායන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ට්‍රාන්ස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ඬදහස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
තරගදෙසැම්බර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
තැනැක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
තුනෙන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
තේරුම්ගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
දඩුගම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
දවාගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
දැකගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
දිනදසුන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
දිලුක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
දුලිත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
දෙබෙදුම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ද්‍රව්‍යයන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ධාරිනියක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
නාට්‍යහල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
නැතිබැරිකම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
නැවකින	NounUncountableConsEnd;
නිපුල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
නිල්වන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
නූනත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
නේරියකුලම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
නොදැනුවත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පතාන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පන්ගස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පරිස්කාර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පවහන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පළමුවෙන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පාහෙ	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පෑස්සුම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පියයුරක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පිලකුමාර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පිළිගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පීරන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පුලුවන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පෙන්ටෝස	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පේ‍්‍රමකුමාර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
පොස්පේට	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ප්‍රමානික	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ප්‍රේතියක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
බන්ඩල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
බලාගන්නන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
බාමර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
බැලැස්ටික	NounUncountableConsEnd;
බුන්දල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
බේස්බෝල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
බොළඳකම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
භාවිතාවන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මතීෂ	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මනුක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මලික	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මාත්රා	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මාවල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මැතිව්ස්ගේ	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මිශ‍්‍රවීම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මුනිවරයන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මූන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මෙවෙන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
මොවුනගේ	NounUncountableConsEnd;
යාල්පානම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
යෙදාගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
රකිමින	NounUncountableConsEnd;
රදවාගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
රඹුකන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
රැකගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
රියද	NounUncountableConsEnd;
රූබල	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ලංකාවත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ලයිනර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ලැබු‍ෙව	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ලේබන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
වඩාත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
වයස්කාරියක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
වර්ණයන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
වාර්ථාවන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
වැදුම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
විකෘතිවීම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
විදෙශ	NounUncountableConsEnd;
වියැයීම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
විසඳාගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
වීසින	NounUncountableConsEnd;
වෙන්කම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
වෙසඟනක	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ව්‍යයාම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ෂූර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සංජිත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සගාර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සදීශ	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සපුරාගත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සලාවත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සාතන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සැටලිම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සිටීනම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සිඳුවීම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සිලිකේට	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සීතාරාම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සුරන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සුසිත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සෙල්වර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
සොය‍ාගැනීම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ස්ටීරොයිඩ	NounUncountableConsEnd;
ෆෙරමෝන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
හදබිම	NounUncountableConsEnd;
හයිඩ්‍රයිඩ	NounUncountableConsEnd;
හර්මිත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
හැඩවන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
හැඳුනම්පත	NounUncountableConsEnd;
හිමිකරුවන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
හෙක්ට්යාර	NounUncountableConsEnd;
හොමෝන	NounUncountableConsEnd;
